Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-904
Indecency with a livestock animal;
penalty.

A
person commits indecency with a livestock animal when such person subjects
an animal to sexual penetration as defined in section 28-318. Indecency with
a livestock animal is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 4.